Louisiana, session 2026, HB573.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:4073 and 4159.2(A) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
33:4071(G), 4121(A)(4) and (K), and 4159.2(D) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§4071. Creation and organization of sewerage and water board
* * *
G. The governing authority of the city of New Orleans may adopt ordinances
that conflict with the provisions of this Section. If the provisions of an ordinance
adopted by the governing authority conflict with the provisions of this Section and
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-843 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 573
the provisions of the ordinance were adopted later than the provisions of this Section
were enacted, the provisions of the ordinance shall supercede the provisions of this
Section.
* * *
§4073. Officers of sewerage and water board; compensation of members
A. The mayor shall be ex officio president of the board. The board shall
elect an executive director, whose salary and bond shall be fixed by the board. The
executive director shall hold office at the pleasure of the board. The election or
removal of the executive director, the amount of his salary, and the acceptance of his
bond shall be determined by a majority vote of the entire board at one of its regular
monthly meetings. The duties of the executive director shall be fixed by the board.
No member of the board shall receive any salary or compensation for his services,
except actual expenses incurred in travelling traveling by authority of, or for the
benefit of the board. The board shall have power to elect one of its members
president pro tempore who shall act in the absence or disability of the president.
B. The governing authority of the city of New Orleans may adopt ordinances
that conflict with the provisions of this Section. If the provisions of an ordinance
adopted by the governing authority conflict with the provisions of this Section and
the provisions of the ordinance were adopted later than the provisions of this Section
were enacted, the provisions of the ordinance shall supercede the provisions of this
Section.
* * *
§4121. New Orleans; rate; fixing; private users of sewerage system; revenue bonds
A.
* * *
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
governing authority of the city of New Orleans may establish alternative procedures
for rate approval.
* * *
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-843 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 573
K. The governing authority of the city of New Orleans may adopt ordinances
that conflict with the provisions of this Section. If the provisions of an ordinance
adopted by the governing authority conflict with the provisions of this Section and
the provisions of the ordinance were adopted later than the provisions of this Section
were enacted, the provisions of the ordinance shall supercede the provisions of this
Section.
* * *
§4159.2. Powers of the city council
A.(1) The city council may establish, by ordinance, procedures regarding the
billing policies of the board, including reducing or modifying a bill received by a
customer, or waiving late charges or accrued interest, subject to the authority
established by the billing ordinance as set forth in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection.
(2) The city council shall establish a billing ordinance working group to
review and opine on ordinances before any such ordinance may be considered by the
Public Works, Sanitation, and Environmental Committee of the city council,
including evaluating the necessity of such an ordinance. This working group shall
convene within ninety days of August 1, 2022, to establish procedural guidelines and
within thirty days of the filing of an ordinance that impacts any aspect of the
Sewerage and Water Board of New Orleans billing process or policies. The findings
of this working group shall be made part of the official record before consideration
of any such ordinance drafted pursuant to this Section.
(3) The billing ordinance review working group shall be comprised of the
following members:
(a) The chairman of the New Orleans City Council Budget, Audit, and Board
of Review Committee, or his designee.
(b) The chairman of the New Orleans City Council Public Works, Sanitation,
and Environment Committee, or his designee.
(c) The chairman of the New Orleans City Council Governmental Affairs
Committee, or his designee.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-843 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 573
(d) A member of the House of Representatives residing in Orleans Parish,
or his designee, appointed by the New Orleans City Council president.
(e) A member of the Senate residing in Orleans Parish, or his designee,
appointed by the New Orleans City Council president.
(f) The executive director of the Sewerage and Water Board of New Orleans,
or his designee.
(g) The president of the Sewerage and Water Board of New Orleans, or his
designee.
(4) (2) The procedures established by the city council shall be uniformly
implemented so as to prevent special treatment as it relates to any bill modification
or amnesty.
* * *
D. The governing authority of the city of New Orleans may adopt ordinances
that conflict with the provisions of this Section. If the provisions of an ordinance
adopted by the governing authority conflict with the provisions of this Section and
the provisions of the ordinance were adopted later than the provisions of this Section
were enacted, the provisions of the ordinance shall supercede the provisions of this
Section.